Mississippi, session 2026, HB1606.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Excellence for All Pilot Program Act". SECTION 2. (1)  The Legislature finds that: (a)  Access to excellent teaching is the most significant school-based factor affecting student academic achievement; (b)  Mississippi school districts face persistent challenges related to educator recruitment and retention; and (c)  Evidence from other states demonstrates that school staffing redesign models, grounded in evidence and focused on extending the reach of excellent teaching to all students, can improve student learning outcomes while providing sustainable career advancement opportunities for educators. (2)  It is the intent of the Legislature to establish a limited pilot program to evaluate evidence based school staffing redesign models. SECTION 3.  As used in this act, unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a) "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Education. (b)  "Local education agency" or "LEA" means a public school district or public charter school in the State of Mississippi. (c)  "Evidence-based school staffing redesign" means a school redesign approach supported by empirical evidence of improved student learning, educator satisfaction, and other outcomes.  It includes features such as teacher-led teams, innovative roles within teams, sustainable compensation structures, strategic scheduling, embedded instructional support, and accountability matching each role. (d)  "Teacher-led team" means a group of educators led by a teacher-leader, who is selected based on demonstrated prior high-growth student learning and is responsible for improving student learning outcomes for all students served by the team. (e)  "Innovative roles within teams" means advanced or specialized roles for teachers and support staff that extend the reach of excellent teaching. (f)  "Sustainable compensation structures" means compensation structures that provide substantially higher pay for teacher-leaders, funded within recurring school budgets and not dependent on ongoing supplemental appropriations. (g)  "Recurring school budget" means a school or district's annual operating budget. (h)  "Strategic scheduling" means protected time during the instructional day aligned to role responsibilities for collaboration, planning, observation, feedback, and data analysis. (i) "Instructional support" means adult-led small-group teaching or tutoring for students. (j) "Accountability matching each role" means clearly defined responsibility for student learning outcomes assigned to teacher-leaders and their teams in a way that matches the structure of the team. (k)  "Expert partner" means an organization selected by the department through a competitive process to provide transition support, technical assistance, and implementation support to participating LEAs and the department. (1)  "Transition support" means targeted system-level and school-level technical assistance provided to LEAs and schools to plan, implement, and sustain school staffing redesign. SECTION 4. (1)  The department shall establish and administer the Excellence for All Pilot Program to support LEAs in the design, implementation, and continuous improvement of evidence-based school staffing redesign. (2)  The goals of the pilot program are to: (a)  Increase student learning growth in core academic subjects; (b)  Improve educator satisfaction, retention, and recruitment through creating meaningful career pathways; and (c)  Promote financially sustainable staffing models capable of long-term scale. SECTION 5. (1)  Participation in the pilot program shall be voluntary. (2)  The department shall establish eligibility criteria, application procedures, and selection timelines consistent with the deadlines set forth in Section 9 of this act. (3)  (a)  The department shall select participating local educational agencies (LEAs) in two (2) cohorts: (i)  Cohort One, to be selected during the first year of the pilot; and (ii)  Cohort Two, to be selected during the second year of the pilot. (b)  The department shall select not fewer than three (3) and not more than five (5) LEAs per cohort. (4)  Each participating LEA shall engage in a design and planning process prior to initial implementation and may, upon approval by the department, add additional schools in successive years of participation following its initial implementation year. (5)  In implementing the pilot, the department shall seek to engage at least three (3) schools per participating LEA per year of implementation, provided that the department may approve alternative participation levels based on LEA size, readiness, or capacity. (6)  Priority may be given to LEAs serving high percentages of students from low-income, rural, or historically underserved communities. SECTION 6.  Each participating LEA shall implement an evidence-based school staffing redesign model that includes, at a minimum: (a)  Teacher-led teams; (b)  Roles for paraeducators and other noncertified staff, focused on providing instructional support and release time for teacher-leaders and their teams; (c)  Sustainable compensation structures; (d)  Strategic scheduling aligned to role responsibilities; (e)  Accountability matching each role; and (f)  Instructional support, including adult-led small-group teaching and tutoring students. SECTION 7. (1)  The department shall ensure participating LEAs receive transition support necessary for planning and implementation. (2)  Transition support may include planning assistance, professional learning, implementation tools, and ongoing technical assistance. SECTION 8. (1)  The department shall select a single expert partner through a competitive and transparent process. (2)  To be eligible, an expert partner must demonstrate a proven record of implementing evidence based school staffing redesign with measurable student and educator outcomes and capacity to deliver transition support and evaluation assistance. (3)  The department may enter into a multiyear agreement with the expert partner, subject to available appropriations. (4)  The expert partner shall assist with LEA recruitment and selection, provide transition support to LEAs and schools, work with the department to identify and address policy barriers, assist with implementation monitoring, support evaluation, and maintain transparency and avoidance of conflicts of interest. SECTION 9.  (1) The department shall issue a solicitation for local educational agency (LEA) participation on or before October 15 of the first and second years of the pilot program. (2) For each solicitation issued under subsection (1) of the section, LEAs shall submit applications on or before December 15, and selections shall be announced on or before February 15. (3) The department may designate a planning and capacity-building period of not less than four (4) months for each participating LEA prior to implementation. SECTION 10. (1)  The department, in collaboration with the expert partner, shall monitor implementation and collect data on student outcomes, educator outcomes, and fiscal sustainability. (2)  Evaluation methods shall include disaggregated analysis by student subgroup, school type, and geography, to the extent practicable. SECTION 11. (1)  The department shall submit an annual report to the Legislature no later than February 1 of each year summarizing program implementation and outcomes. (2)  Reports shall be made publicly available. SECTION 12. (1)  The department shall adopt rules and issue guidance necessary to implement this act. (2)  The department shall implement the pilot program in a manner consistent with existing State Board of Education rules and waiver authority. SECTION 13. Implementation of the Excellence for All Pilot Program, including transition support, technical assistance, evaluation activities, and any contractual services, shall be subject to the availability of funds appropriated by the Legislature for such purpose. SECTION 14. (1)  During the final year of the pilot program, the Department shall conduct a comprehensive evaluation in consultation with an independent evaluator. (2)  The final evaluation shall be presented to the House Education Committee and Senate Education Committee no later than December 1, 2030. (3)  This act shall stand repealed from and after July 1, 2031, unless reauthorized by the Legislature. SECTION 15.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.